California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(3) Any statement is made to the effect that the whole or any part of the proceeds from the sale will go to or be used for any charitable purpose or organization.

(4) The name of any organization of law enforcement personnel, firefighters, or other persons who protect the public safety is used or referred to as an inducement for transferring any money or property, unless the only expressed or implied purpose of the sales solicitation is for the sole benefit of the actual active membership of the organization.

(c) A solicitation for charitable purposes, or a sale, offer or attempt to sell for charitable purposes, shall include the making or disseminating or causing to be made or disseminated before the public in this state, in any newspaper or other publication, or any advertising device, or by public outcry or proclamation, or in any other manner or means whatsoever any such solicitation.

(d) For purposes of this article, “charity” shall include any person who, or any nonprofit community organization, fraternal, benevolent, educational, philanthropic, or service organization, or governmental employee organization which, solicits or obtains contributions solicited from the public for charitable purposes or holds any assets for charitable purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 445, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.25.

(a) A charity, as defined in subdivision (e), may engage in a solicitation for charitable purposes that involves persons standing in a public roadway soliciting contributions from passing motorists, if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The persons to be engaged in the solicitation are law enforcement personnel, firefighters, or other persons employed to protect the public safety of a local agency, as defined in subdivision (d), and that are soliciting solely in
 an area that is within the service area of that local agency.

(2) The charity files an application with the city, county, or city and county, as applicable, having jurisdiction over the location or locations where the solicitation is to occur. The application shall be filed not later than 10 business days before the date that the solicitation is to begin and shall include all of the following:

(A) The date or dates and times of day when the solicitation is to occur.

(B) The location or locations where the solicitation is to occur.

(C) The manner and conditions under which the solicitation is to occur.

(D) Proof of a valid liability insurance policy in the amount of at least one million
 dollars ($1,000,000) insuring the charity, the local agency referenced in paragraph (1), and the city, county, or city and county referenced in this paragraph against bodily injury and property damage arising out of or in connection with the solicitation.

(b) The city, county, or city and county shall approve the application within five business days of the filing date of the application, but may impose reasonable conditions in writing that are consistent with the intent of this section and that are based on articulated public safety concerns.

(c) By acting under this section, a local agency referred to in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and a city, county, or city and county referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) do not waive or limit any immunity from liability provided by any other provision of law.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local agency” means a city, county, city and county, special district, joint powers authority, or other political subdivision of the state.

(e) For purposes of this section, “charity” means a charity subject to supervision by the Attorney General pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) The Legislature finds and declares that the extraordinary liability insurance requirement contained in this section is necessary in order to protect the public safety due solely to the particular and unique circumstances governed by this section that involve charitable solicitations from passing motorists in a public roadway, where the activity of solicitation may present a recognizable potential safety hazard.

(g) This section is not intended to prevent a local agency from adopting an ordinance regulating the time, place, or manner of charitable solicitations in a public roadway by other persons or charities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 446, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.3.

(a) Prior to any solicitation or sales solicitation for charitable purposes, the solicitor or seller shall exhibit to the prospective donor or purchaser a card entitled “Solicitation or Sale for Charitable Purposes Card.” The card shall be signed and dated under penalty of perjury by an individual who is a principal, staff member, or officer of the soliciting organization. The card shall give the name and address of the soliciting organization or the person who signed the card and the name and business address of the paid individual who is
 doing the actual soliciting.

In lieu of exhibiting a card, the solicitor or seller may distribute during the course of the solicitation any printed material, such as a solicitation brochure, provided the material complies with the standards set forth below, and provided that the solicitor or seller informs the prospective donor or purchaser that the information as required below is contained in the printed material.

Information on the card or printed material shall be presented in at least 10-point type and shall include the following:

(1) The name and address of the combined campaign, each organization, or fund on behalf of which all or any part of the money collected will be utilized for charitable purposes.

(2) If there is no organization or fund, the manner in which the money collected will
 be utilized for charitable purposes.

(3) The non-tax-exempt status of the organization or fund, if the organization or fund for which the money or funds are being solicited does not have a charitable tax exemption under both federal and state law.

(4) The percentage of the total gift or purchase price which may be deducted as a charitable contribution under both federal and state law. If no portion is so deductible the card shall state that “This contribution is not tax deductible.”

(5) If the organization making the solicitation represents any nongovernmental organization by any name which includes, but is not limited to, the term “officer,” “peace officer,” “police,” “law enforcement,” “reserve officer,” “deputy,” “California Highway Patrol,” “Highway Patrol,” “deputy sheriff,” “firefighter,” or “fire marshall,”
 which would reasonably be understood to imply that the organization is composed of law enforcement or firefighting personnel, the solicitor shall give the total number of members in the organization and the number of members working or living within the county where the solicitation is being made, and if the solicitation is for advertising, the statewide circulation of the publication in which the solicited ad will appear.

(6) If the organization making the solicitation represents any nongovernmental organization by any name which includes, but is not limited to, the term “veteran” or “veterans,” which would reasonably be understood to imply that the organization is composed of veterans, the solicitor shall give the total number of members in the organization and the number of members working or living within the county where the solicitation is being made. This paragraph does not apply to federally chartered or state incorporated veterans’
 organizations with 200 or more dues paying members or to a thrift store operated or controlled by a federally chartered or state incorporated veterans’ organization. This paragraph does not apply to any state incorporated community-based organization that provides direct services to veterans and their families and qualifies as a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code and Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Knowing and willful noncompliance by any individual volunteer who receives no compensation of any type from or in connection with a solicitation by any charitable organization shall subject the solicitor or seller to the penalties of the law.

(c) When the solicitation is not a sales solicitation, any individual volunteer who receives no compensation of any type from, or in connection with, a solicitation by any
 charitable organization may comply with the disclosure provisions by providing the name and address of the charitable organization on behalf of which all or any part of the money collected will be utilized for charitable purposes, by stating the charitable purposes for which the solicitation is made, and by stating to the person solicited that information about revenues and expenses of the organization, including its administration and fundraising costs, may be obtained by contacting the organization’s office at the address disclosed. The organization shall provide this information to the person solicited within seven days after receipt of the request.

(d) A volunteer who receives no compensation of any type from, or in connection with, a solicitation or sales solicitation by a charitable organization which has qualified for a tax exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, and who is 18 years of age or younger, is
 not required to make any disclosures pursuant to this section.

(e) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.4.

If the initial solicitation or sales solicitation is made by radio, television, letter, telephone, or any other means not involving direct personal contact with the person solicited, including over the Internet, this solicitation shall clearly disclose the information required by Section 17510.3. This disclosure requirement shall not apply to any radio or television solicitation of 60 seconds or less. If the gift is subsequently made or the sale is subsequently consummated, the solicitation or sale for charitable purposes card shall be mailed to or otherwise
 delivered to the donor, or to the buyer with the item or items purchased.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 599, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.5.

(a) The financial records of a soliciting organization shall be maintained on the basis of generally accepted accounting principles as defined by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, the Governmental Accounting Standards Board, or the Financial Accounting Standards Board.

(b) The disclosure requirement of paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 17510.3 shall be based on the same accounting principles used to maintain the soliciting organization’s
 financial records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 919, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.6.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to solicitations, sales, offers, or attempts to sell within the membership of a charitable organization or upon its regular occupied premises, nor shall it apply to funds raised as authorized by Section 326.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1267, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.7.

Compliance with any city or county ordinance which provides for disclosure of information relating to solicitations or sales solicitations for charitable purposes substantially similar to and no less than the disclosure requirements of this article shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this article. The provisions of this article are not intended to preempt any city or county ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 509, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, there exists a fiduciary relationship between a charity or any person soliciting on behalf of a charity, and the person from whom a charitable contribution is being solicited. The acceptance of charitable contributions by a charity or any person soliciting on behalf of a charity establishes a charitable trust and a duty on the part of the charity and the person soliciting on behalf of the charity to use those charitable contributions for the declared charitable purposes for which they are sought. This section
 is declarative of existing trust law principles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1170, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.85.

(a) An individual, corporation, or other legal entity who for compensation solicits funds or other property in this state for charitable purposes shall disclose prior to an oral solicitation or sales solicitation made by direct personal contact, radio, television, telephone, or over the Internet, or at the same time as a written solicitation or sales solicitation:

(1) That the solicitation or sales solicitation is being conducted by a commercial fundraiser for charitable purposes.

(2) The name of the commercial fundraiser for charitable purposes as registered with the Attorney General pursuant to Section
 12599 of the Government Code.

(b) The disclosures required pursuant to this section, if printed or if presented electronically, shall be in at least 12-point type, and shall be clear and conspicuous, as defined in Section 17601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.   (AB 556)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.87.

Any individual, corporation, or other legal entity who, for compensation, solicits funds or other property in this state for charitable purposes is prohibited from retaining more than 50 percent of the net proceeds collected as a fee for fundraising services. For purposes of this section only, a fee does not include a flat fee agreed upon prior to the initiation of direct solicitation that is associated with the development of a solicitation or marketing campaign for charitable purposes.

A violation of this section
 shall not be a crime. However, it is subject to all applicable civil remedies. In addition, any person who collects any fee in excess of the limits imposed by this section shall be subject to a penalty in the amount of the excess fee, which penalty may be collected in an action by any person authorized to bring an enforcement action under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) and distributed as provided in that chapter.

This section shall only apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1279, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.9.

(a) A charity engaged in any solicitation or sales solicitation for charitable purposes, that collected more than 50 percent of its annual income and more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in charitable contributions from donors in this state during the previous calendar year, and that spent more than 25 percent of its annual income on “nonprogram activities,” which is defined as the sum of the expenditures specified in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), shall annually prepare and provide to the Attorney General’s Registry of Charities and Fundraisers three copies of a one-page document that provides the information required by subdivision (b). If the charity
 is subject to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the document shall be submitted together with the charity’s report required by Section 12586 of the Government Code, and shall provide information consistent with that provided to the registry pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The contents of the document required pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be established by the Attorney General in a manner consistent with the procedures set forth in this subdivision and in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 12586 of the Government Code, and shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Total revenue and
 contributions received of the charity.

(2) The dollar amount and the percentage of total revenue and charitable contributions allocated to funding each of the following administrative functions:

(A) Total salaries of all persons employed by the charity.

(B) Fundraising.

(C) Travel expenses.

(D) Overhead and other expenses related to managing and administering the charity.

(E) The salaries of the five highest compensated persons employed by the charity.

(3) The dollar
 amount and percentage of total revenue and charitable contributions allocated to programs.

(c) Each charity subject to this section shall make available for distribution the document required pursuant to subdivision (a)
 following a request made in person, by telephone, or by mail. Each request shall be accompanied by a stamped, self-addressed envelope provided by the requester.

(d) The Attorney General shall make available for public review at the Registry of Charities and Fundraisers in Sacramento and in the San Francisco and Los Angeles offices of the Attorney General, the documents provided by charities pursuant to subdivision (a), and shall maintain these documents separately from other documents provided by charities pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 2.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.95.

The Attorney General shall annually publish a report that includes information provided to the Registry of Charities and Fundraisers pursuant to Section 17510.9 for all charities reporting under that section. The report shall be made available to public main libraries in the state at no cost and to any person upon request and the payment of a reasonable fee to cover the costs of publication and distribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 478, Sec. 3.   (AB 1756)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.4. Telephonic Sellers [17511. - 17514.]

17511.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the widespread use of telephone solicitors to initiate sales of goods, real property, and investment opportunities has created numerous problems for purchasers and investors which are inimical to good business practices. Telephonic sales have a significant impact upon the economy and well-being of this state and its local communities. However, purchasers have suffered substantial losses because of (1) misrepresentations, (2) lack of full and complete information regarding both the telephonic seller and the goods and investments the telephonic seller is offering, and (3) failure of delivery. The
 provisions of this article relating to telephonic sellers are necessary for the public welfare.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to (1) provide each prospective telephonic sales purchaser with information necessary to make an intelligent decision regarding the offer made, (2) safeguard the public against deceit and financial hardship, (3) insure, foster, and encourage competition and fair dealings among telephonic sellers by requiring adequate disclosure, and (4) prohibit representations that tend to mislead. This article shall be construed liberally in order to achieve these purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17511.1.

As used in this article, “telephonic seller” or “seller” means a person who, on their own behalf or through salespersons or through the use of an automatic dialing-announcing device, as defined in Section 2871 of the Public Utilities Code, causes a telephone solicitation or attempted telephone solicitation to occur which meets the criteria specified in subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) and who is not exempted by subdivision (e), as follows:

(a) A telephone solicitation or attempted telephone solicitation wherein the telephonic seller initiates telephonic contact with a prospective purchaser and represents or implies one or more of the following:

(1) That a prospective purchaser who buys one or more items will also receive
 additional or other items, whether or not of the same type as purchased, without further cost. For purposes of this subdivision, “further cost” does not include actual postage or common carrier delivery charges, if any.

(2) That a prospective purchaser will receive a prize or gift, if the person also encourages the prospective purchaser to do either of the following:

(A) Purchase or rent any goods or services.

(B) Pay any money, including, but not limited to, a delivery or handling charge.

(3) That a prospective purchaser is able to obtain any item or service at a price which the seller states or implies is below the regular price of the item or service offered. This paragraph shall not apply to retailers who, within the previous 12 months, have sold a
 majority of their goods or services through in-person sales at retail stores.

(4) That a prospective purchaser who buys office equipment or supplies will, because of some unusual event or imminent price increase, be able to buy these items at prices which are below those that are usually charged or will be charged for the items.

(5) That the seller is a person other than the person they are.

(6) That the items for sale are manufactured or supplied by a person other than the actual manufacturer or supplier.

(7) That the seller is offering to sell the prospective purchaser any gold, silver, or other metals, including coins, diamonds, rubies, sapphires, or other stones, coal or other minerals, or any interest in oil, gas, or mineral fields, wells, or
 exploration sites, or any other investment opportunity of any type whatsoever.

(8) That the seller is offering to make a loan, or to arrange or assist in arranging a loan or to assist in providing information which may lead to the obtaining of a loan, unless no payment of any kind is made until the loan proceeds are disbursed to the borrower.

(9) That a prospective purchaser will receive a credit card, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1747.02 of the Civil Code, if the purchaser pays an upfront or preapplication fee for the credit card to the telephonic seller.

(b) A solicitation or attempted solicitation which is made by telephone in response to inquiries generated by unrequested notifications sent by the seller to persons who have not previously purchased goods or services from the seller or who have not
 previously requested credit from the seller, to a prospective purchaser wherein the seller represents or implies to the recipient of the notification that any of the following applies to the recipient:

(1) That the recipient has in any manner been specially selected to receive the notification or the offer contained in the notification.

(2) That the recipient will receive a prize or gift if the recipient calls the seller.

(3) That if the recipient buys one or more items from the seller, the recipient will also receive additional or other items, whether or not of the same type as purchased, without further cost or at a cost which the seller states or implies is less than the regular price of such items.

However, this subdivision does not apply to the solicitation of sales by
 a catalog seller who periodically issues and delivers catalogs to potential purchasers by mail or by other means. This exception only applies if the catalog includes a written description or illustration and the sales price of each item of merchandise offered for sale, includes at least 24 full pages of written material or illustrations, is distributed in more than one state, and has an annual circulation of not less than 250,000 customers.

(c) A solicitation or attempted solicitation which is made by telephone in response to inquiries generated by advertisements on behalf of the telephonic seller wherein it is represented or implied that the seller is offering to sell to the prospective purchaser any gold, silver, or other metals, including coins, diamonds, rubies, sapphires, or other stones, coal or other minerals, or any interest in oil, gas, or mineral fields, wells, or exploration sites, or any other investment opportunity of any type
 whatsoever.

(d) A solicitation or attempted solicitation which is made by telephone in response to inquiries generated by advertisements on behalf of the telephonic seller wherein it is represented or implied that the seller is offering to make a loan or to arrange or assist in arranging a loan or to assist in providing information which may lead to the obtaining of a loan, unless no payment of any kind is made until the loan proceeds are disbursed to the borrower.

(e) For purposes of this article, “telephonic seller” or “seller” does not include any of the following:

(1) A person offering or selling a security qualified under Section 25110, 25120, or 25130 of the Corporations Code or exempt from qualification under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 25100) of Part 2 of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.
 The fact that a notice claiming an exemption under the Corporate Securities Law of 1968 is filed with the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation does not create an exemption under this paragraph.

(2) A person licensed pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4, when the solicited transaction is governed by that law.

(3) A person licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3, when the solicited transaction is governed by that law.

(4) A person licensed or certificated pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 680) of Division 1 of the Insurance Code, including a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) thereof, when the solicited transaction is governed by that law.

(5) A person offering or selling a franchise registered pursuant to Section 31110 of the Corporations Code or exempt from registration under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31100) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code. The fact that a notice claiming an exemption under the Franchise Investment Law is filed with the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation does not create an exemption under this paragraph.

(6) A person soliciting the sale of a seller assisted marketing plan, as defined in Title 2.7 (commencing with Section 1812.200) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, who has filed with the Attorney General the documents required by Section 1812.203 of the Civil Code.

(7) A person primarily soliciting the sale of a newspaper of general circulation, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Chapter 1 of Division 7
 of Title 1 of the Government Code, a magazine, or membership in a book or record club whose program operates in conformity with the requirements of Section 1584.5 of the Civil Code.

(8) A person soliciting business from prospective purchasers who have previously purchased from the business enterprise for which the person is calling.

(9) A person soliciting without the intent to complete and who does not complete the sales presentation during the telephone solicitation but completes the sales presentation at a later face-to-face meeting between the solicitor and the prospective purchaser. However, if a seller, directly following a telephone solicitation, causes an individual whose primary purpose it is to go to the prospective purchaser to collect the payment or deliver any item purchased, this exemption does not apply.

(10) Any supervised financial institution or parent, subsidiary, or subsidiary of parent thereof. As used in this paragraph, “supervised financial institution” means any commercial bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, industrial loan company, finance lender or broker, or insurer, provided that the institution is subject to supervision by an official or agency of this state or of the United States.

(11) A person soliciting the sale of a preneed funeral arrangement regulated by Article 9 (commencing with Section 7735) of Chapter 12 of Division 3.

(12) A person licensed pursuant to Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 9600) of Division 3 when acting pursuant to that licensure.

(13) A person soliciting the sale of services provided by a cable television system licensed or franchised
 pursuant to Section 53066 of the Government Code or any other authority.

(14) A person or an affiliate of a person whose business is regulated by the Public Utilities Commission.

(15) A person soliciting the sale of a commodity pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 58601) of Division 21 of the Food and Agricultural Code, if the solicitation neither intends to, nor actually results in, a sale which costs the purchaser in excess of one hundred dollars ($100).

(16) An issuer or subsidiary of an issuer that has a security listed on a national securities exchange if the exchange has been certified by rule or order of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under subdivision (o) of Section 25100 of the Corporations Code. A subsidiary of an issuer that qualifies for exemption under this paragraph is
 not itself exempt unless not less than 60 percent of the voting power of its shares is owned by the qualifying issuer or issuers.

(17) A person soliciting exclusively the sale of telephone answering services to be provided by that person or that person’s employer.

(18) A person soliciting a transaction regulated by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission if the person is registered or temporarily licensed for this activity with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission under the Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1 et seq.), and the registration or license has not expired or been suspended or revoked.

(19) A person who sells coins or bullion at a price which is not more than 25 percent more than the price at which the seller is concurrently buying the same coins or bullion, if: (A) the seller has had a retail
 location in California from which they have been selling coins or bullion to the public in person for at least three years; (B) the telephonic solicitations are not the person’s primary business and sales made telephonically make up less than 20 percent of the person’s total retail sales; and (C) the person claiming an exemption pursuant to this subdivision complies with Section 17511.3, as applicable, and subdivision (p) of Section 17511.4.

(20) A person licensed pursuant to Division 1.2 (commencing with Section 2000) of the Financial Code to engage in the business of money transmission if the license has not expired or been suspended or revoked.

(21) A person licensed as a residential mortgage lender or servicer pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code, when acting under the authority of that license.

(22) A corporation that meets all of the following conditions:

(A) It has been exempt from taxation under Section 23701e of the Revenue and Taxation Code for a minimum of 10 years.

(B) It has maintained its principal purpose for a minimum of 10 years.

(C) It has been incorporated in the state for a minimum of 25 years.

(f) In any civil proceeding alleging a violation of this article, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it, and in any criminal proceeding alleging a violation of this article, the burden of producing evidence to support a defense based upon an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming
 it.

(g) Compliance with this article does not satisfy nor substitute for any requirements for license, registration, or regulation mandated by other laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 15.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

17511.2.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Justice.

(b) “Item” means any goods and services, and includes coupon books which are to be used with businesses other than the seller’s business.

(c) “Owner” means a person who owns or controls 10 percent or more of the equity of, or otherwise has claim to 10 percent or more of the net income of, a telephonic seller.

(d) “Person” includes an individual, firm, association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, or any other business entity.

(e) “Principal” means an owner, an executive officer of a corporation, a general partner of a partnership, a sole proprietor of a sole proprietorship, a trustee of a trust, or any other individual with similar supervisory functions with respect to any person.

(f) “Purchaser” or “prospective purchaser” means a person who is solicited to become or does become obligated to a telephonic seller.

(g) “Salesperson” means any individual employed, appointed or authorized by a telephonic seller, whether referred to by the telephonic seller as an agent, representative, or independent contractor, who attempts to solicit or solicits a sale on
 behalf of the telephonic seller. The principals of a seller are themselves salespersons if they solicit sales on behalf of the telephonic seller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1009, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17511.3.

(a) Not less than 10 days before doing business in this state, a telephonic seller shall register with the department by filing with the Consumer Protection Section of the department the information required by Section 17511.4 and a filing fee of fifty dollars ($50). A seller shall be deemed to do business in this state if the seller solicits prospective purchasers from locations in this state or solicits prospective purchasers who are located in this state.

A person claiming an exemption pursuant to paragraph (19) of subdivision (d) of Section 17511.1 shall file with the Consumer Protection Section of the department, in lieu of the information required by subdivisions (a) to (o), inclusive, of Section 17511.4, the information required by
 subdivision (p) of Section 17511.4 and a filing fee of fifty dollars ($50).

The information required by Section 17511.4 shall be submitted on a form provided by the Attorney General and shall be verified by a declaration signed by each principal of the telephonic seller under penalty of perjury. The declaration shall specify the date and location of signing. Information submitted pursuant to subdivision (j) or (k) of Section 17511.4 shall be clearly identified and appended to the filing. The information submitted pursuant to Section 17511.4 shall become part of the investigatory records and intelligence information compiled by the department for law enforcement purposes.

(b) Registration of a telephonic seller shall be valid for one year from the effective date thereof and may be annually renewed by making the filing required by Section 17511.4 and paying a filing fee of fifty dollars ($50).

(c) Whenever, before expiration of a seller’s annual registration, there is a material change in the information required by Section 17511.4, the seller shall, within 10 days, file an addendum updating the information with the Consumer Protection Section of the department. However, changes in salespersons soliciting on behalf of a seller shall be updated by addendums filed, if necessary, in quarterly intervals computed from the effective date of registration. The addendum shall provide the required information for all salespersons who are currently soliciting or have solicited on behalf of the seller at any time during the period between the filing of the registration, or the last addendum, and the current addendum, and shall include salespersons no longer soliciting for the seller as of the date of the filing of the current addendum.

(d) Upon receipt of a filing and filing fee
 pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the department shall send the telephonic seller a written confirmation of receipt of the filing. If the seller has more than one business location, the written confirmation shall be sent to the principal business location identified in the seller’s filing in sufficient number so that the seller has receipt of filing, within 10 days of receipt thereof, in a conspicuous place at each of the seller’s business locations and shall have available for inspection by any governmental agency at each location a copy of the entire registration statement which has been filed with the department. Until confirmation of receipt of filing is received and posted, the seller shall post in a conspicuous place at each of the seller’s business locations within this state a copy of the first page of the registration form sent to the department. The seller shall also post in close proximity to either the confirmation of receipt of filing, or until the confirmation is received, the first page of
 the submitted registration form, the name of the individual or individuals in charge of each location from which the seller does business in this state, as defined in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 2.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17511.4.

Each filing pursuant to Section 17511.3 shall contain the following information:

(a) The name or names of the seller, including the name under which the seller is doing or intends to do business, if different from the name of the seller, and the name of any parent or affiliated organization (1) that will engage in business transactions with purchasers relating to
 sales solicited by the seller or (2) that accepts responsibility for statements made by, or acts of, the seller relating to sales solicited by the seller.

(b) The seller’s business form and place of organization and, if the seller is a corporation, a copy of its articles of incorporation and bylaws and amendments thereto, or, if a partnership, a copy of the partnership agreement, or if operating under a fictitious business name, the location where the fictitious name has been registered. All the same information shall be included for any parent or affiliated organization disclosed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) The complete street address or addresses of all locations, designating the principal location from which the telephonic seller will be conducting business. If the principal business location of the seller is not in this state, then the seller shall also designate which of
 its locations within this state is its main location in the state.

(d) A listing of all telephone numbers to be used by the seller and the address where each telephone using each of these telephone numbers is located.

(e) The name of, and the office held by, the seller’s officers, directors, trustees, general and limited partners, sole proprietor, and owners, as the case may be, and the names of those persons who have management responsibilities in connection with the seller’s business activities.
